Texas statutes.
HUMAN RESOURCES CODE

TITLE 9. HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES

CHAPTER 132. FACILITATION OF DELIVERY OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES

Sec. 132.001. GOVERNOR'S AGENDA. (a) The governor shall establish an agenda that addresses needed adjustments in federal legislation, agency rules and regulations, programs, and policies that affect:

(1) health and human services delivery;

(2) client and provider eligibility;

(3) administration; and

(4) funding.

(b) The governor shall develop and amend the agenda in conjunction and cooperation with federal and state elected officials, state agency staff, the executive commissioner of the Health and Human Services Commission, and the executive director of the Texas Workforce Commission.

(c) The agenda must include:

(1) a list of specific issues of federal law or policy identified and ranked by health and human services agencies;

(2) impact statements concerning the needed adjustments to federal law or policy;

(3) a discussion of fiscal matters concerning each ranked issue; and

(4) specific recommendations for changes in federal law or policy.

(d) The governor shall submit the agenda to the Texas congressional delegation and to the Office of State-Federal Relations and shall annually amend the agenda and rank agenda items. The agenda must identify issues of federal law, rules and regulations, or programs of common concern to different state agencies and programs.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 8.114(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 4.434, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 132.002. EXPANSION OF CLIENT ELIGIBILITY SCREENING AND DETERMINATION. (a) Based on a cost-benefit analysis, the Health and Human Services Commission, where feasible, shall relocate an employee with the ability to certify eligibility for financial and medical programs to an office or facility that would enhance client access.

(b) Based on a cost-benefit analysis, the Health and Human Services Commission shall coordinate the expansion and use of integrated eligibility screening instruments and the relocation of state employees on a timetable determined by the commission.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 8.114(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 4.434, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 132.003. LOCATION OF OFFICES AND FACILITIES. (a) As leases on office space expire, the Health and Human Services Commission shall determine the needs for space and the location of offices of the health and human services agencies to enable the commission to achieve a cost-effective, one-stop or service center method of service delivery.

(b) In this section, "health and human services agencies" includes the:

(1) Department of Aging and Disability Services;

(2) Department of State Health Services;

(3) Department of Family and Protective Services;

(4) Department of Assistive and Rehabilitative Services; and

(5) Health and Human Services Commission.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 8.114(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 21.06, 21.07(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 53, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 4.434, eff. April 2, 2015.